Arizona, session 57th-2nd-regular, HB2006.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of the State of Arizona: Section 1. Section 16-461, Arizona Revised Statutes, is amended to read: START_STATUTE16-461. Sample primary election ballots; submission to party chairmen for examination; preparation, printing and distribution of ballot A. At least forty-five days before a primary election, the officer in charge of that election shall: 1. Prepare a proof of a sample ballot. 2. Submit the sample ballot proof of each party to the county chairman or in city or town primaries to the city or town chairman. 3. Mail a sample ballot proof to each candidate for whom a nomination paper and petitions have been filed. B. Within two calendar days after receipt of the sample ballot, the county chairman of each political party and any candidate in that election who has submitted and confirmed an email address shall suggest to the election officer any change the chairman or candidate considers should be made in the chairman's or candidate's party ballot, and if on examination the election officer finds an error or omission on the ballot, the officer shall correct it. The election officer shall print and distribute the sample ballots as required by law, shall maintain a copy of each sample ballot and shall post a notice indicating that sample ballots are available on request. The official sample ballot shall be printed on colored paper or white paper with a different colored stripe for each party that is represented on that ballot. For voters who are not registered with a party that is entitled to continued representation on the ballot pursuant to section 16-804, the election officer may print and distribute the required sample ballots in an alternative format, including a reduced size format. C. Not later than forty days before a primary election, the county chairman of a political party may request one sample primary election ballot of the chairman's party for each election precinct. D. The board of supervisors shall have printed mailer-type sample ballots for a primary election and shall mail at least eleven fourteen days before the election, or at least eleven days before the election in counties that contain a United States postal service processing and distribution center, one sample ballot of a political party to each household containing a registered voter of that political party unless that registered voter is on the active early voting list established pursuant to section 16-544. Each sample ballot shall contain the following statement:  "This is a sample ballot and cannot be used as an official ballot under any circumstances". A certified claim shall be presented to the secretary of state by the board of supervisors for the actual cost of printing, labeling and postage of each sample ballot actually mailed, and the secretary of state shall direct payment of the authenticated claim from funds of the secretary of state's office. the secretary of state shall annually determine and publish a list of counties that do not contain a United States postal service processing and distribution center based on information provided by the United States postal service. E. For city and town elections, the governing body of a city or town may have printed mailer-type sample ballots for a primary election.  If the city or town has printed such sample ballots, the city or town shall provide for the distribution of such ballots and shall bear the expense of printing and distributing such sample ballots. F. The return address on the mailer-type sample ballots shall may not contain the name of an appointed or elected public officer, nor may and the name of an appointed or elected public officer may not be used to indicate who produced the sample ballot. G. The great seal of the state of Arizona shall be imprinted along with the words "official voting materials" on the mailing face of each sample ballot. In county, city or town elections the seal of such jurisdiction shall be substituted for the state seal. END_STATUTE Sec. 2. Section 16-510, Arizona Revised Statutes, is amended to read: START_STATUTE16-510. Sample ballots; preparation and distribution A. Before printing the sample ballots for the general election the board of supervisors shall send to each candidate whose name did not appear on the preceding primary election ballot and to the county chairperson of each political party a ballot proof of the sample ballot for the candidate's and chairperson's review.  Within two calendar days after receipt of the sample ballot, those candidates and the county chairperson of each political party shall suggest to the election officer any change the candidate or chairperson considers should be made to the ballot, and if on examination the election officer finds an error or omission on the ballot, the officer shall correct the error or omission. B. The board of supervisors shall print and distribute, for the information of voters at each polling place, a number of sample ballots as it deems necessary. C. The board of supervisors shall have printed mailer-type sample ballots for a general election and shall mail at least eleven fourteen days before the election, or at least eleven days before the election in counties that contain a United States postal service processing and distribution center, one such sample ballot to each household in the county containing a registered voter unless that registered voter is on the active early voting list established pursuant to section 16-544.  Each sample ballot shall contain the following statement:  "This is a sample ballot and cannot be used as an official ballot under any circumstances". A certified claim shall be presented to the secretary of state by the board of supervisors for the actual cost of printing, labeling and postage of each sample ballot actually mailed, and the secretary of state shall direct payment of the authenticated claim from funds of the secretary of state's office. the secretary of state shall annually determine and publish a list of counties that do not contain a United States postal service processing and distribution center based on information provided by the United States postal service. D. For city and town elections, the governing body of a city or town may have printed mailer-type sample ballots for a general election. If the city or town has printed such sample ballots, the city or town shall provide for the distribution of such ballots and shall bear the expense of printing and distributing such sample ballots. E. For special district elections, the governing body of a special district may have printed mailer-type sample ballots. If the special district has printed such sample ballots, the special district shall provide for the distribution of such ballots and shall bear the expense of printing and distributing such sample ballots. END_STATUTE APPROVED BY THE GOVERNOR APRIL 13, 2026. FILED IN THE OFFICE OF THE SECRETARY OF STATE APRIL 13, 2026.